Utah statutes.
26-8b-501.   Tampering with an AED prohibited -- Penalties.

A person is guilty of a class C misdemeanor if the person removes, tampers with, or otherwise disturbs an AED, AED cabinet or enclosure, or AED sign, unless:

(1)  the person is authorized by the AED owner for the purpose of:

(a)  inspecting the AED or AED cabinet or enclosure; or

(b)  performing maintenance or repairs on the AED, the AED cabinet or enclosure, a wall or structure that the AED cabinet or enclosure is directly attached to, or an AED sign;

(2)  the person is responding to, or providing care to, a potential sudden cardiac arrest patient; or

(3)  the person acts in good faith with the intent to support, and not to violate, the recognized purposes of the AED.



Enacted by Chapter 98, 2013 General Session

